Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB735.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1547(f) and (l) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1547. Chemical testing to determine amount of alcohol or controlled substance.* * *(f) Other evidence admissible.--(1) Subsections (a) through (i) shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether or not the defendant was under the influence of:(i) alcohol[.];(ii) alcohol in combination with a drug; (iii) a drug; or12345678910111213141516171819 (iv) a combination of drugs.(2) Testimony from a certified drug recognition expert shall be admissible in any judicial proceeding as evidence of impairment.* * *(l) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Adult." A person 21 years of age or older."Drug recognition expert." An individual who offers expert testimony as evidence of impairment while holding a current credential issued by the International Association of Chiefs of Police and the Drug Evaluation and Classification Program State Coordinator."Minor." A person under 21 years of age.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0735PN0800 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516